District of Columbia statutes.
50-2421.15

Applicability.

This subchapter and section 13 of D.C. Law 15-35 shall apply to all vehicles impounded after October 28, 2003. This subchapter and section 13 of D.C. Law 15-35 shall also apply to all vehicles impounded prior to October 28, 2003, provided that notice is sent to the owners and lien holders in accordance with the provisions of § 50-2421.07(b) or (c), as is applicable.

Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-35, § 15, 50 DCR 6579
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 81, 52 DCR 2638
D.C. Law 15-354 validated a previously made technical correction.
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 15 of Removal and Disposition of Abandoned and Other Unlawfully Parked Vehicles Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-171, October 6, 2003, 50 DCR 9163).